Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3989.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 17 O.S. 2021, Section 158.25, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 95, O.S.L. 2023 (17 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 158.25), is amended to read as follows:
Section 158.25. A. Except as otherwise provided herein, each
retail electric supplier shall have the exclusive right to furnish
retail electric service to all electric-consuming facilities located
within its certified territory, and shall not furnish, make
available, render or extend its retail electric service to a
consumer for use in electric-consuming facilities located within the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3989 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

cert ified territory of another retail electric supplier; provided
that any retail electric supplier may extend its facilities through
the certified territory of another retail electric supplier, if such
extension is necessary for such supplier to connect any of its
facilities or to serve its consumers within its own certified
territory.
B. Except as provided in subsections C and E of this section,
any new electric-consuming facility located in an unincorporated
area which has not as yet been included in a map issued by the
Commission, pursuant to Section 158.24 of this title, or certified,
pursuant to Section 158.24 of this title, shall be furnished retail
electric service by the retail electric supplier which has an
existing distribution line in closer proximity to such electric-
consuming facility than is the nearest existing distribution line of
any other retail electric supplier. Any disputes under this
subsection shall be resolved by the Commission.
C. If the Commission, after hearing, shall determine that the
retail electric service being furnished or proposed to be furnished
by a retail electric supplier to an electric-consuming facility is
inadequate and is not likely to be made adequate, the Commission may
authorize another retail electric supplier to furnish retail
electric service to such facility.
D. Except as provided in subsection C of this section, no
retail electric supplier shall furnish, make available, render or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3989 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

exte nd retail electric service to any electric-consuming facility to
which such service is being lawfully furnished by another retail
electric supplier on September 10, 1971, or to which retail electric
service is lawfully commenced thereafter in accordance with this
section by another retail electric supplier.
E. The provisions of this act shall not preclude any retail
electric supplier from extending its service after September 10,
1971, (1) to its own property and facilities, in an unincorporated
area, and (2) subject to subsection D of this section, to an
electric-consuming facility requiring electric service, in an
unincorporated area, if the connected actual total metered load for
initial full operation of such electric-consuming facility is to be
1,000 kw or larger. After the effective date of this act, a retail
electric supplier shall provide notice to the Oklahoma Corporation
Commission that it plans to serve a new electric-consuming facility
under this large load exception. Together with its notice, it shall
include written certification from a licensed professional engineer
that the load will reach or is reasonably expected to reach or
exceed 1,000 kw of actual metered load during the first twenty-four
(24) months of commercial operation. At the end of the twenty-four-
month period, the Commission or the incumbent retail electric
supplier may request verification, and obtain records through a
Commission proceeding to determine whether the 1,000 kw level was
reached. If that load fails to reach the 1,000 kw load during the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3989 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

twen ty-four (24) months after commercial operation, then said retail
electric supplier shall pay a penalty of one percent (1%) of sales
to that electric-consuming facility per annum to the incumbent
retail electric supplier until such time as it does reach 1,000 kw.
The penalty shall not be recovered directly from ratepayers or
members, and shall be paid from the profits or margins of the retail
electric supplier making the payments. The Corporation Commission
shall enforce this penalty upon application of an interested party
and may waive the penalty upon a finding that the retail electric
supplier serving said load was not at fault in serving said load
which did not reach 1,000 kw for reasons unforeseen when service was
extended. This subsection shall not apply to any such load served
before the effective date of this act.
F. To achieve the purposes of efficient, cost-effective retail
electric service without duplication of electric facilities and to
avoid unfairly shifting costs to residential consumers, retail
electric service providers are required to establish and utilize
rate tariffs which are specifically applicable to a rate class of
customers composed of electric-consuming facilities being served in
accord with the 1,000 kw size exception found in subsection E of
this section and located outside the retail electric service
provider's certified territory. These tariffs may be for a specific
electric-consuming facility or for a class of electric-consuming
facilities taking service under this provision. For retail electric
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3989 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

serv ice providers that are rate-regulated by the Commission, the
rates supporting this rate class shall be determined in the rate-
regulated service provider's most recent rate proceeding. Rates for
this rate class shall be designed to recover (i) the costs of
extending service to the competitive load of electric-consuming
facilities of 1,000 kw or larger located outside the retail electric
service provider's certified territory; and (ii) the allocated share
of other costs associated with providing service to the electric-
consuming facility. Such tariffs shall be cost-of-service based and
shall not subsidize other rate classes or be subsidized by other
rate classes. Unless costs of extending service to such a new load
are collected from the customer, those costs shall be included in
the cost of service study in the next rate proceeding. If the
electric service provider, in whose certified territory the
competitive load is seeking electric service, chooses in writing not
to compete for said competitive load or does not respond within
thirty (30) days of receiving written notice by the customer, the
terms of this subsection shall not apply.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ENERGY
April 23, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED





SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3989 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)